District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Clean Hands Economic Expansion and Revitalization Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Subchapter II of Chapter 28 of Chapter 47 of the District of Columbia Official
Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-2861(2) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the word “or” at the end.
(2) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
or” in its place.
(3) A new subparagraph (D) is added to read as follows:
“(D) Beginning on October 1, 2025, any occupational or business license issued
pursuant to §§ 47-2801 through 47-2853.224; §§ 47.2883.01-47-2889.08; and Title 3 of the
District of Columbia Official Code.”.
(b) Section 47-2862 is amended as follows:

(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) Paragraphs (1) and (2) are amended by striking the phrase “$100” both
times it appears and inserting the phrase “$2,500” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “$100” and inserting
the phrase “$2,500” in its place.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking phrase “$100” and inserting the phrase
“$2,500” in its place.
(c) Section 47-2863(a)(2) is amended by striking the phrase “$100” and inserting the
phrase “$2,500” in its place.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.